Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
580

ANNULMENT,
DIVORCE, AND SEPARATION

Part I. General Provisions

Section

580-1 Jurisdiction; hearing

580-2 Commencement of action; summons

580-3 Service

580-3.5 Personal judgment against absent defendant

580-4 Cross-complaint

580-5 Proof

580-6 Guardian ad litem for incompetent
defendant

580-7 Examination of parties to prevent
collusion

580-8 Procedure when collusion suspected

580-9 Temporary support, etc.

580-10 Restraining orders; appointment of master

580-11 Care, custody, education, and maintenance
of children

pendente lite

580-12 Sequestration of property

580-13 Security and enforcement of maintenance
and alimony

580-14 Renumbered

580-15 County attorneys to represent court

580-16 Divorce decree, support order; social
security number

Part II. Annulment

580-21 Grounds for annulment

580-22 Nonage

580-23 Former husband or wife living

580-24 Allowance for spouse and family

580-25 Inheritance by children

580-26 Lack of mental capacity

580-27 Legitimacy in case of annulment

580-28 Physical incapacity

580-29 No annulment solely on confessions

Part III. Divorce

580-41 Divorce

580-41.5 Battered spouses; exemption from mediation
in divorce

proceedings

580-42 Irretrievable breakdown

580-42.5 Recrimination no defense

580-43 Repealed

580-44 Persons affected with Hansen's disease
represented by

attorney general

580-45 Decree

580-46 Final judgment; nunc pro tunc entry;
validation of

certain marriages

580-47 Support orders; division of property

580-47.5 Notice to parties with children

580-48 Repealed

580-49 Support of insane spouse after divorce

580-50 Repealed

580-51 Modification of alimony on remarriage

580-52 Marriage after divorce

580-53 to 55 Repealed

580-56 Property rights following dissolution of
marriage

Part IV. Separation

580-71 Grounds for separation

580-71.5 Separation no bar to divorce

580-72 Married persons may bring action in own
name

580-73 Repealed

580-74 Support of spouse and children

580-75 Status of spouse during separation

580-76 Revocation or modification of separation
decrees

Cross References

Marriage and family therapists, see chapter 451J.

Case Notes

"Allowance" as used in chapter is synonym for
spousal or family support. 73 H. 566, 836 P.2d 1081.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next